Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TASK FORCE ON STANDARDIZED IDENTIFICATION FOR EMERGENCY RESPONDERS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Task Force on Standardized Identification for Emergency Responders is established to develop a plan to create a standard form of identification for use by emergency responders in the state and to make policy and funding recommendations to the legislature. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of public safety, or a designee; new text end new text begin (2) the chief of the Minnesota State Patrol, or a designee; new text end new text begin (3) the state fire marshal, or a designee; new text end new text begin (4) the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, or a designee; new text end new text begin (5) the director of Driver and Vehicle Services, or a designee; new text end new text begin (6) the director of the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training, or a designee; new text end new text begin (7) the director of the Minnesota Office of Emergency Medical Services, or a designee; new text end new text begin (8) the chair of the Metropolitan Airports Commission, or a designee; new text end new text begin (9) a representative from the Minnesota Chiefs of Police Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (10) a representative from the Minnesota Sheriffs' Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (11) a representative from the Minnesota Police and Peace Officers Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (12) a representative from the Minnesota State Fire Chiefs Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (13) a representative from the Minnesota Professional Fire Fighters Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; and new text end new text begin (14) a representative from the Minnesota State Fire Department Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors. new text end new text begin (b) Appointments must be made no later than July 15, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) Members must serve without compensation. new text end new text begin (d) Members of the task force serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority or until the task force expires. Vacancies must be filled by the appointing authority consistent with the qualifications of the vacating member required by this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Officers; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's designee must convene the first meeting of the task force by August 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) At the first meeting, the members of the task force must elect a chair and may elect other officers as the members deem necessary. new text end new text begin (c) The task force must meet monthly or as determined by the chair. The task force must meet frequently enough to accomplish the tasks identified in this section. new text end new text begin (d) Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must design a standardized identification for emergency responders in the state and prepare a plan to implement mandatory use of a standardized identification by emergency responders and their employers. new text end new text begin (b) The design for the standardized identification must include: new text end new text begin (1) a photograph of the emergency responder; new text end new text begin (2) the name of the emergency responder; new text end new text begin (3) a physical description of the emergency responder; new text end new text begin (4) a clear indication of whether the emergency responder is a peace officer, firefighter, emergency medical services provider, or other type of emergency responder; and new text end new text begin (5) information about the emergency responder's certifications and areas of expertise or a scannable code that provides access to that information. new text end new text begin (c) The task force may require that other information be included on the standardized identification, including but not limited to the name of an employer and a license number. new text end new text begin (d) The task force may recommend that the standardized identification be in the form of a physical card, an electronic document, or both. new text end new text begin (e) The task force must consider whether the state should issue the standardized identification or establish standards and requirements for identification issued by local units of government and other employers. new text end new text begin (f) At a minimum, the plan to implement mandatory use of a standardized identification by emergency responders must: new text end new text begin (1) identify a schedule for issuing identification to current and future emergency responders; new text end new text begin (2) make recommendations regarding application procedures, including developing a procedure to verify the identity of a recipient; new text end new text begin (3) identify data that must be shared in order to create a standardized identification and propose any legislative changes necessary to allow such information to be shared; new text end new text begin (4) make recommendations regarding renewal of a standardized identification; new text end new text begin (5) make recommendations regarding updating information for emergency responders; new text end new text begin (6) make recommendations for policies and procedures to address situations when a person's license or other authorization is suspended, revoked, or canceled; and new text end new text begin (7) make recommendations regarding the collection, destruction, deletion, or other invalidation of a standardized identification when a person no longer works as an emergency responder. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, the task force must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety on the work of the task force including any recommendations for legislation or funding. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires the day after submitting the report required under subdivision 5. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin TASK FORCE ON STANDARDIZED IDENTIFICATION FOR EMERGENCY RESPONDERS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety to implement the Task Force on Standardized Identification for Emergency Responders. new text end